Idaho, session 2026, H0892.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 59-906A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
59-906A. BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS -- VACANCIES -- HOW FILLED. In
the event of a vacancy on a board of county commissioners, such vacancy shall
be filled as herein provided pursuant to the provisions of this section. The
county central committee of the same political party, if any, of the former
member whose seat is vacant shall submit, within fifteen (15) days, a list
of three (3) nominations to the governor. For counties with a population of
less than fifty thousand (50,000), the county central committee shall sub-
mit to the governor a list of one (1) nominee. For counties with a popula-
tion greater than fifty thousand (50,000) but less than one hundred thousand
(100,000), the county central committee shall submit to the governor a list
of two (2) nominees. For counties with a population greater than one hundred
thousand (100,000), the county central committee shall submit to the gover-
nor a list of three (3) nominees. The governor shall fill the vacancy by ap-
pointment from the list of three (3) nominations within fifteen (15) days.
If no appointment has been made within fifteen (15) days, the county central
committee shall designate one (1) of the three (3) nominees to fill the va-
cancy. The vacancy shall be so filled until the expiration of the term in
which the vacancy occurs. The county central committee of the same politi-
cal party, if any, of the former member, shall select a person who possesses
the constitutional qualifications to fill the vacant office to which he the
person is nominated, and who is affiliated with the same political party, if
any, as the former member whose seat is vacant. Upon failure of the committee
to make such selection before the expiration of the fifteen (15) day period,
the governor shall, within five (5) days, fill said vacancy by appointing a
person having the qualifications above set forth in the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.